Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center

15.280.
Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center — Reports — Purposes — Confidentiality of information and record copies.

A Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center is hereby created as part of the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

The Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center shall provide its reports and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly through the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

The Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center shall:

Improve the quality and usefulness of criminal justice statistics and research results that are disseminated to citizens, public agencies, and private agencies in Kentucky through the collection, analysis, assimilation, and analysis of research and statistical data from within the cabinet, from other executive, judicial, and legislative agencies, and from private sources;

Publish research results and statistical data that are requested by criminal justice agencies;

Improve the relationship between citizens and criminal justice agencies of Kentucky by conducting citizen surveys of the needs, attitudes, and behavior relating to crime and justice; and

Strengthen the relationship between Kentucky criminal justice agencies and the Bureau of Justice Statistics, United States Department of Justice, by:

Providing justice statistics to the Bureau of Justice Statistics as required; and

Serving as a clearinghouse for Bureau of Justice Statistics materials.

The Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may expend any federal grants or federal funds provided for carrying out the functions and authority as assigned in this section. Further, the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may employ such employees as may be necessary to fulfill the duties, responsibilities, and functions assigned by this section.

Information and record copies that are confidential under state or federal law and are provided to the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center shall not become the information and records of the center and shall not lose their confidentiality by virtue of the center’s access to the information and records. The original information and records used to generate information and record copies provided to the center shall be maintained by the appropriate agency in accordance with state and federal law and shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. All open records requests shall be made to the appropriate agency, not to the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center. Information and record copies provided to the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center for review shall be exempt from the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 224, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 16, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 158, § 97, effective June 29, 2017.